Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-403
Formation; bond for expenses.

At the time of filing the petition the petitioners shall also file a bond, with surety or sureties to be approved by the county clerk, which bond shall run to the county and be conditioned to pay all expenses of the county by reason of such proceedings in case the district be not formed.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 3, p. 475;

R.S.1913, § 1868;

C.S.1922, § 1815;

C.S.1929, § 31-503;

R.S.1943, § 31-403.

Bond signed by surety who was also a petitioner was sufficient. Prucka v. Eastern Sarpy Drainage Dist., 157 Neb. 284, 59 N.W.2d 761 (1953).

Bond is valid, though conditioned to become void if the district be organized, or if petitioners pay costs. O'Brien v. Schneider, 88 Neb. 479, 129 N.W. 1002 (1911).